Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 47.27.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“Alaska Native family assistance grant” means a grant under AS

47.27.200

;

“Alaska Native family assistance program” means a program funded in part by a grant under AS

47.27.200

;

“cash assistance” means assistance for basic living expenses provided under the Alaska temporary assistance program; “cash assistance” includes cash, vouchers, or third-party vendor payments; “cash assistance” does not include a diversion payment under AS

47.27.026

or self-sufficiency services;

“child care assistance” means payments made by the Department of Health and Social Services or the Department of Education and Early Development to Alaska temporary assistance program participant families or to providers for the care of children of the participant families;

“child support” includes court-ordered or administratively ordered child support, medical support, and spousal support;

“child support services agency” means the child support services agency in the Department of Revenue;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“dependent child” means an individual who

has not attained

18 years of age; or

19 years of age and is a full-time student in a secondary school or in the equivalent level of vocational or technical training; and

is not an applicant under AS

47.27.020

;

“diversion payment” means a diversion payment paid under AS

47.27.026

;

“federally approved tribal family assistance plan” means a plan that meets the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 612 and has been approved for financing through a tribal family assistance grant directly from the United States Department of Health and Human Services;

“self-sufficiency services” means work-related services, community service work referrals, child care assistance, emergency assistance, service vouchers, equipment vouchers, work stipends, transportation assistance, wage subsidies, and other work supports and services determined by the department in regulation to promote family self-sufficiency;

“work activities” includes job readiness assessments, on-the-job training, education and vocational training, job sampling, job search requirements, subsidized and unsubsidized work, and community work service.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 76 ch 58 SLA 1999; am §§ 46 — 48 ch 69 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 22 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Renumbered in 2002 to maintain the terms in alphabetical order. Paragraphs (1) and (2) were enacted as paragraphs (11) and (12) and paragraph (11) was enacted as paragraph (13); renumbered in 2005, at which time former paragraphs (1) — (8) were renumbered as (3) — (10) and former paragraphs (9) and (10) were renumbered as (12) and (13).

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska temporary assistance program, see 7 AAC 45.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective June 30, 2005, added paragraphs (11)-(13) [now (1), (2), and (11) respectively].

Sec. 47.27.990.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska temporary assistance program.

History.

(§ 7 ch 107 SLA 1996)